src/fst/stems/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON pronouns

нӑң:нӑң PersSg2  "sinä" ;
ма:ма PersSg1  "minä" ;
ԯув:ԯув PersSg3  "hän" ;
ԯыв:ԯыв PersPl3  "he" ;
мың:мың PersPl1  "me" ;
нын:нын PersPl2  "te" ;
